test/tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/fstspeller-gt-norm-yamls/CmpNP-tests_fstspeller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# Testing CmpNp/xxx tags. Currently only +CmpNP/Pref, +CmpNP/Last and +CmpNP/None are in use in smj

Tests:
  CmpNP/Pref tests:
    miehte+N: ~miehte 
    miehte+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#biegga+N+Sem/Substnc_Wthr+Sg+Nom: miehte#biegga
    biegga+N+Sem/Substnc_Wthr+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#miehte+N: ~biegga#miehte
    badje+N: ~badje
    badje+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#goahte+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Nom: badje#goahte
    goahte+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#badje+N: ~goahte#badje
  
  CmpNP/Last tests: 
    niellja+Num+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sem/Body+Der1+Der/k+A+Sg+Nom: nielje#juolgak
    bieles+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Ill: [bælláj, bälláj]   # alone ok
    bielkká+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#bieles+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Ill: [bielkká#bælláj, bielkká#bälláj, ~bielkáj#bælláj, ~bielká#bälláj, ~bielkáj#bälláj, ~bielká#bælláj]
    bieles+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#bielkká+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Ill: [~biellej#bielkkáj, ~bieles#bielkkáj, ~bielle#bielkkáj]
    guokta+Num+Cmp#ahke+N+Sem/Ani_Hum+Der1+Der/sasj+A+Sg+Nom: guovte#ahkásasj
    
    # lexc restricts entries in NAMAK and SASJ from standing alone, but maybe they actually should have a CmpNP/Suff tag instead...
    
  CmpNP/None tests:
    mahte+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: mahte
    mahte+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#goahte+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [~mahte#goahte, ~madij#goahte, ~made#goahte]
    goahte+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#mahte+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen: [~goade#made, ~goahte#made, ~gådij#made]
   
